Illinois, session 104th, HB2995.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Code is amended by changing Sections 522-85.10 and 22-94 and by adding Section 22-85.15 as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 5/22-85.10)7    Sec. 22-85.10. Notification Parental notification of 8alleged sexual misconduct.9    (a) The governing body of each school district, charter 10school, or nonpublic school shall implement a procedure under 11which notice is provided to the parents or guardians of an 12enrolled student, unless the student is at least 18 years of 13age or emancipated, with whom an employee, agent of the 14school, or a contractor of the school is alleged to have 15engaged in sexual misconduct as defined in subsection (c) of 16Section 22-85.5 of this Code. Notice provided to the parent or 17guardian of a student with a disability must not conflict with 18the student's individualized education plan or a Section 504 19plan under the federal Rehabilitation Act of 1973 and the 20requirements of applicable State or federal law. The procedure 21shall include: 22        (1) Consideration of the time frame for providing 23    notice to the student and the student's parents or   HB2995- 2 -LRB104 11192 LNS 21274 b1    guardians if the alleged sexual misconduct is also being 2    investigated by the Illinois Department of Children and 3    Family Services or law enforcement as described in Section 4    22-85 of this Code.5        (2) Prior to notification of the student's parents or 6    guardians, notification must first be provided to the 7    student in a developmentally appropriate manner and 8    include:9            (A) that notice will be given to the student's 10        parents or guardians;11            (B) what information will be included in the 12        notice to the student's parents or guardians;13            (C) available resources for the student within the 14        school and community in accordance with Article 26A of 15        this Code and available counseling services under 16        Section 3-550 of the Mental Health and Developmental 17        Disabilities Code; and18            (D) beginning July 1, 2025, the name and contact 19        information for the domestic and sexual violence and 20        parenting resource coordinator under Section 26A-35 of 21        this Code.22        (3) After notification of the student as required 23    under paragraph (2), the student's parents or guardians 24    shall be notified in writing:25            (A) of the alleged misconduct; and26            (B) of available resources for the student within   HB2995- 3 -LRB104 11192 LNS 21274 b1        the school and the community in accordance with 2        Article 26A of this Code and, beginning on July 1, 3        2025, the name and contact information for the 4        domestic and sexual violence and parenting resource 5        coordinator under Section 26A-35 of this Code.6        (4) Notification must be provided as soon as feasible 7    after the employing entity becomes aware that alleged 8    misconduct may have occurred, subject to the requirements 9    of subsection (f) of Section 22-85 of this Code.10        (5) Notification of the same information provided in 11    paragraph (3) shall be contemporaneously provided to the 12    employee, agent of the school, or contractor of the school 13    who is alleged to have engaged in sexual misconduct, as 14    defined in Section 22-85.5 of this Code, and the 15    employee's, agent's, or contractor's exclusive bargaining 16    representative, if applicable. 17    (b) The governing body of each school district, charter 18school, or nonpublic school shall implement a procedure under 19which notice is provided to the parents or guardians of a 20student, subject to subsection (a), when any formal action has 21been taken by the governing body relating to the employment of 22the alleged perpetrator following the investigation of sexual 23misconduct, including whether employment was terminated or 24whether the governing body accepted the resignation of the 25employee. Notice provided to the parents or guardians of a 26student with a disability must not conflict with the student's   HB2995- 4 -LRB104 11192 LNS 21274 b1individualized education plan or a Section 504 plan under the 2federal Rehabilitation Act of 1973 and the requirements of 3applicable State or federal law. The procedure shall include:4        (1) Consideration of the time frame for providing 5    notice to the student and the student's parents or 6    guardians if the alleged sexual misconduct is also being 7    investigated by the Illinois Department of Children and 8    Family Services or law enforcement as described in Section 9    22-85 of this Code.10        (2) Prior to notification of the student's parents or 11    guardians, notification must first be provided to the 12    student in a developmentally appropriate manner and 13    include:14            (A) that notice will be given to the student's 15        parent or guardian of the governing body's action;16            (B) what information will be included in the 17        notice to the student's parents or guardians;18            (C) available resources for the student within the 19        school and community in accordance with Article 26A of 20        this Code and available counseling services under 21        Section 3-550 of the Mental Health and Developmental 22        Disabilities Code; and23            (D) beginning July 1, 2025, the name and contact 24        information for the domestic and sexual violence and 25        parenting resource coordinator under Section 26A-35 of 26        this Code.  HB2995- 5 -LRB104 11192 LNS 21274 b1        (3) After notification of the student as required in 2    paragraph (2), the student's parents or guardians shall be 3    notified in writing:4            (A) of the governing body's action;5            (B) whether a report concerning the alleged sexual 6        misconduct was or will be submitted to the State 7        Superintendent of Education and the applicable 8        regional superintendent of schools pursuant to Section 9        10-21.9 of this Code; and10            (C) of available resources for the student within 11        the school and the community in accordance with 12        Article 26A of this Code and, beginning on July 1, 13        2025, the name and contact information for the 14        domestic and sexual violence and parenting resource 15        coordinator under Section 26A-35 of this Code.16        (4) Notification must be provided as soon as feasible 17    after the board action is taken, subject to the 18    requirements of subsection (f) of Section 22-85 of this 19    Code.20        (5) For the purposes of subsection (b), if the student 21    is no longer enrolled at the time formal action is taken, 22    sending written notice to the last known address in the 23    student's file fulfills notification requirements.24    (c) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Section, 25notification to the student prior to notification of the 26student's parents or guardians shall not be required to the   HB2995- 6 -LRB104 11192 LNS 21274 b1extent an employee or agent of the school district, charter 2school, or nonpublic school deems it necessary to address an 3imminent risk of serious physical injury or death of a student 4or another person, including the victim. If prior notification 5to the student is not given, notification to the student shall 6be provided as soon as practicable and without delay following 7the notification to the student's parents or guardians.8    (d) Subsections (a) and (b) shall not apply if the 9student's parent or guardian is the alleged perpetrator of the 10misconduct.11(Source: P.A. 102-702, eff. 7-1-23.) 12    (105 ILCS 5/22-85.15 new)13    Sec. 22-85.15. Investigation of alleged sexual misconduct. 14The governing body of each school district, charter school, or 15nonpublic school shall implement an investigation procedure 16under which an employee, agent of the school, or contractor of 17the school is alleged to have engaged in sexual misconduct, as 18defined in subsection (c) of Section 22-85.5 of this Code.19        (1) Consideration of the time frame for investigation 20    may be given if the alleged sexual misconduct is also 21    being investigated by the Department of Children and 22    Family Services or law enforcement as described in Section 23    22-85 of this Code. An employer investigation shall be 24    delayed if directed by the Department of Children and 25    Family Services or law enforcement or a determination may   HB2995- 7 -LRB104 11192 LNS 21274 b1    be deferred as set out in paragraph (8).2        (2) Unless the investigation is delayed or deferred as 3    set forth in this Section, the school district, charter 4    school, or nonpublic school shall begin its investigation, 5    in good faith, as soon as practically possible following 6    the notifications provided under Section 22-85.10 of this 7    code, but no later than 14 days after such notification 8    issue.9        (3) The purpose of the investigation is to determine 10    whether the allegation is substantiated as to the 11    allegation of sexual misconduct, as defined by Section 12    22-85.5 of this Code, and, if so, whether any formal 13    action will be taken.14        (4) The investigator shall have:15            (A) direct, in-person contact with the alleged 16        victim;17            (B) the employee, agent of the school, or 18        contractor of the school who is alleged to have 19        engaged in sexual misconduct, as defined by Section 20        22-85.5 of this Code; and21            (C) in-person or telephone contact with the 22        reporter who made the accusation, if the reporter's 23        identity and whereabouts are available and in-person 24        or telephone contact with any other necessary 25        witnesses. 26        Contact shall only be waived if any of the individuals   HB2995- 8 -LRB104 11192 LNS 21274 b1    refuse to meet with the investigator or are determined to 2    be inaccessible. The employee, agent of the school, or 3    contractor of the school who is the subject of the 4    investigation is entitled to representation through the 5    exclusive bargaining representative, if applicable. 6        (5) The investigation, including the final 7    investigative report with a determination and any 8    recommended formal action, shall be completed within 60 9    days following the notifications provided under Section 10    22-85.10 of this Code. For good cause, the investigation 11    timeline may be extended, one time, up to an additional 30 12    days.13        (6) Upon completion of the formal investigation, the 14    investigator shall make a determination regarding the 15    allegation along with any recommended formal action. This 16    determination shall be based upon the information gathered 17    from other persons during the investigation and the direct 18    observations made by the investigative staff during the 19    investigation substantiate the allegation.20        (7) The formal investigation must result in one of the 21    following determinations:22            (A) substantiated; if there is corroborated, 23        consistent, and precise evidence substantiating the 24        allegation of sexual misconduct, as defined by Section 25        22-85.5 of this Code;26            (B) unsubstantiated; if there is a lack of   HB2995- 9 -LRB104 11192 LNS 21274 b1        evidence to substantiate the allegation as set out in 2        subparagraph (A); or3            (C) indeterminable; if the investigator is unable, 4        for good cause, to gather sufficient facts to conduct 5        a good faith formal investigation.6        (8) A formal investigation result shall be considered 7    unsubstantiated where the Department of Children and 8    Family Services has investigated the same allegation under 9    its jurisdiction under the Abused and Neglected Child 10    Reporting Act and determined the allegation is unfounded, 11    an indicated finding is expunged on appeal, or the matter 12    was referred to law enforcement and any charges brought 13    were not pursued, dropped, or the matter was otherwise 14    adjudicated in favor of the employee, agent of the school, 15    or contractor of the school.16        (9) An employee, agent of the school, or contractor of 17    the school who receives a determination of substantiated 18    may appeal the determination and any recommended formal 19    action by requesting a due process hearing before an 20    independent hearing officer or the State Board of 21    Education's list of due process hearing officers. The 22    appeal must be made to the governing body of the school 23    district, charter school, or nonpublic school, in writing, 24    within 45 days of being served with a substantiated 25    determination.26            (A) The State Board of Education shall, from the   HB2995- 10 -LRB104 11192 LNS 21274 b1        master list provide, on a rotating basis, a list of 5 2        prospective hearing officers within 5 business days 3        after receiving a request for a list.4            (B) Within 3 days, the parties will engage in an 5        alternating striking process until one name remains. 6        Unless waived, the employee has the right to strike 7        first.8            (C) The scope of the hearing shall be whether the 9        investigation supports a substantiated determination 10        of sexual misconduct, as defined by Section 22-85.5 of 11        this Code, along with the recommended formal action by 12        a preponderance of the evidence. The burden at the 13        hearing shall be on the employer.14            (D) The proper parties to the hearing are the 15        employee and the governing body of the school 16        district, charter school, or nonpublic school. Each 17        party has the right to retain representation, present 18        evidence and testimony, cross-examine witnesses, and 19        make arguments.20            (E) The hearing officer may uphold the 21        substantiated determination and any recommended formal 22        action, uphold the substantiated determination but 23        modify or vacate any recommended formal action, or 24        find that the determination is unsubstantiated and 25        vacate the recommended formal action. The hearing 26        officer's decision shall be considered a final   HB2995- 11 -LRB104 11192 LNS 21274 b1        decision, subject to administrative review under 2        Article 3 of the Code of Civil Procedure. 3    (105 ILCS 5/22-94)4    Sec. 22-94. Employment history review.5    (a) This Section applies to all permanent and temporary 6positions for employment with a school or a contractor of a 7school involving direct contact with children or students.8    (b) In this Section:9    "Contractor" means firms holding contracts with any school 10including, but not limited to, food service workers, school 11bus drivers and other transportation employees, who have 12direct contact with children or students.13    "Direct contact with children or students" means the 14possibility of care, supervision, guidance, or control of 15children or students or routine interaction with children or 16students.17    "School" means a public or nonpublic elementary or 18secondary school.19    "Sexual misconduct" has the meaning ascribed to it in 20subsection (c) of Section 22-85.5 of this Code and applies to 21information or knowledge of events investigated or deferred 22from investigation arising after December 3, 2021 (the 23effective date of Public Act 102-676).24    (b-5) Any adverse determination issued to an employee, 25agent of the school, or contractor of the school for events   HB2995- 12 -LRB104 11192 LNS 21274 b1that occurred prior to the effective date of this amendatory 2Act of the 104the General Assembly shall be considered null 3and void only if any and all investigations conducted by a 4regulatory third party entity resulted in:5        (1) a finding that the allegation was false, 6    unfounded, indeterminable, or unsubstantiated; or7        (2) a previous finding was otherwise overturned or 8    expunged on appeal.9    The adverse determination and related documents must then 10be removed from the applicable personnel records within 14 11business days after written notice.12    (c) Prior to hiring an applicant to work directly with 13children or students, a school or contractor must ensure that 14the following criteria are met:15        (1) the school or contractor has no knowledge or 16    information pertaining to the applicant that would 17    disqualify the applicant from employment;18        (2) the applicant swears or affirms that the applicant 19    is not disqualified from employment;20        (3) using the template developed by the State Board of 21    Education, the applicant provides all of the following:22            (A) a list, including the name, address, telephone 23        number, and other relevant contact information of the 24        following:25                (i) the applicant's current employer;26                (ii) all former employers of the applicant   HB2995- 13 -LRB104 11192 LNS 21274 b1            that were schools or school contractors, as well 2            as all former employers at which the applicant had 3            direct contact with children or students;4            (B) A written authorization that consents to and 5        authorizes disclosure by the applicant's current and 6        former employers under subparagraph (A) of this 7        paragraph (3) of the information requested under 8        paragraph (4) of this subsection (c) and the release 9        of related records and that releases those employers 10        from any liability that may arise from such disclosure 11        or release of records pursuant to subsection (e).12            (C) A written statement of whether the applicant:13                (i) has been the subject of a sexual 14            misconduct allegation, unless a subsequent 15            investigation resulted in a finding that the 16            allegation was false, unfounded, indeterminable, 17            or unsubstantiated or a finding was otherwise 18            overturned or expunged on appeal;19                (ii) has ever been discharged from, been asked 20            to resign from, resigned from, or otherwise been 21            separated from any employment, has ever been 22            disciplined by an employer, or has ever had an 23            employment contract not renewed due to an 24            adjudication or finding of sexual misconduct or 25            while an allegation of sexual misconduct was 26            pending or under investigation, unless the   HB2995- 14 -LRB104 11192 LNS 21274 b1            investigation resulted in a finding that the 2            allegation was false, unfounded, indeterminable, 3            or unsubstantiated or a finding was otherwise 4            overturned or expunged on appeal; or5                (iii) has ever had a license or certificate 6            suspended, surrendered, or revoked or had an 7            application for licensure, approval, or 8            endorsement denied due to an adjudication or 9            finding of sexual misconduct or while an 10            allegation of sexual misconduct was pending or 11            under investigation, unless the investigation 12            resulted in a finding that the allegation was 13            false, unfounded, indeterminable, or 14            unsubstantiated or a finding was otherwise 15            overturned or expunged on appeal.16        (4) The school or contractor shall initiate a review 17    of the employment history of the applicant by contacting 18    those employers listed by the applicant under subparagraph 19    (A) of paragraph (3) of this subsection (c) and, using the 20    template developed by the State Board of Education, 21    request all of the following information:22            (A) the dates of employment of the applicant;23            (B) a statement as to whether the applicant:24                (i) has been the subject of a sexual 25            misconduct allegation, unless a subsequent 26            investigation resulted in a finding that the   HB2995- 15 -LRB104 11192 LNS 21274 b1            allegation was false, unfounded, indeterminable, 2            or unsubstantiated or a finding was otherwise 3            overturned or expunged on appeal;4                (ii) was discharged from, was asked to resign 5            from, resigned from, or was otherwise separated 6            from any employment, was disciplined by the 7            employer, or had an employment contract not 8            renewed due to an adjudication or finding of 9            sexual misconduct or while an allegation of sexual 10            misconduct was pending or under investigation, 11            unless the investigation resulted in a finding 12            that the allegation was false, unfounded, 13            indeterminable, or unsubstantiated or a finding 14            was otherwise overturned or expunged on appeal; or15                (iii) has ever had a license or certificate 16            suspended, surrendered, or revoked due to an 17            adjudication or finding of sexual misconduct or 18            while an allegation of sexual misconduct was 19            pending or under investigation, unless the 20            investigation resulted in a finding that the 21            allegation was false, unfounded, indeterminable, 22            or unsubstantiated or a finding was otherwise 23            overturned or expunged on appeal.24            (C) The template shall include the following 25        option: if the employer does not have records or 26        evidence regarding the questions in items (i) through   HB2995- 16 -LRB104 11192 LNS 21274 b1        (iii) of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (4) of 2        subsection (c), the employer may state that there is 3        no knowledge of information pertaining to the 4        applicant that would disqualify the applicant from 5        employment.6        (5) For applicants licensed by the State Board of 7    Education, the school district, charter school, or 8    nonpublic school shall verify the applicant's reported 9    previous employers with previous employers in the State 10    Board of Education's educator licensure database to ensure 11    accuracy.12    (d) An applicant who provides false information or 13willfully fails to disclose information required in subsection 14(c) shall be subject to discipline, up to and including 15termination or denial of employment.16    (e) No later than 20 days after receiving a request for 17information required under paragraph (4) of subsection (c), an 18employer who has or had an employment relationship with the 19applicant shall disclose the information requested. If the 20employer has an office of human resources or a central office, 21information shall be provided by that office. The employer who 22has or had an employment relationship with the applicant shall 23disclose the information on the template developed by the 24State Board of Education. For any affirmative response to 25items (i) through (iii) of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (4) 26or subsection (c), the employer who has or had an employment   HB2995- 17 -LRB104 11192 LNS 21274 b1relationship with the applicant shall provide additional 2information about the matters disclosed and all related 3records.4    A school shall complete the template at time of separation 5from employment, or at the request of the employee, and 6maintain it as part of the employee's personnel file. If the 7school completes an investigation after an employee's 8separation from employment, the school shall update the 9information accordingly.10    Information received under this Section shall not be 11deemed a public record.12    A school or contractor who receives information under this 13subsection (e) may use the information for the purpose of 14evaluating an applicant's fitness to be hired or for continued 15employment and may report the information, as appropriate, to 16the State Board of Education, a State licensing agency, a law 17enforcement agency, a child protective services agency, 18another school or contractor, or a prospective employer.19    An employer, school, school administrator, or contractor 20who provides information or records about a current or former 21employee or applicant under this Section is immune from 22criminal and civil liability for the disclosure of the 23information or records, unless the information or records 24provided were knowingly false. This immunity shall be in 25addition to and not a limitation on any other immunity 26provided by law or any absolute or conditional privileges   HB2995- 18 -LRB104 11192 LNS 21274 b1applicable to the disclosure by virtue of the circumstances or 2the applicant's consent to the disclosure and shall extent to 3any circumstances when the employer, school, school 4administrator, or contractor in good faith shares findings of 5sexual misconduct with another employer.6    Unless the laws of another state prevent the release of 7the information or records requested or disclosure is 8restricted by the terms of a contract entered into prior to 9July 1, 2023 (the effective date of Public Act 102-702) this 10amendatory Act of the 102nd General Assembly, and 11notwithstanding any other provisions of law to the contrary, 12an employer, school, school administrator, contractor, or 13applicant shall report and disclose, in accordance with this 14Section, all relevant information, records, and documentation 15that may otherwise be confidential.16    (f) A school or contractor may not hire an applicant who 17does not provide the information required under subsection (c) 18for a position involving direct contact with children or 19students.20    (g) Beginning on July 1, 2023 (the effective date of 21Public Act 102-702) this amendatory Act of the 102nd General 22Assembly, a school or contractor may not enter into a 23collective bargaining agreement, an employment contract, an 24agreement for resignation or termination, a severance 25agreement, or any other contract or agreement or take any 26action that:  HB2995- 19 -LRB104 11192 LNS 21274 b1        (1) has the effect of suppressing information 2    concerning a pending investigation or a completed 3    investigation in which an allegation was substantiated 4    related to a report of suspected sexual misconduct by a 5    current or former employee;6        (2) affects the ability of the school or contractor to 7    report suspected sexual misconduct to the appropriate 8    authorities; or9        (3) requires the school or contractor to expunge 10    information about allegations or findings of suspected 11    sexual misconduct from any documents maintained by the 12    school or contractor, unless, after an investigation, an 13    allegation is found to be false, unfounded, 14    indeterminable, or unsubstantiated or a finding was 15    otherwise overturned or expunged on appeal.16    (h) Any provision of an employment contract or agreement 17for resignation or termination or a severance agreement that 18is executed, amended, or entered into on or after July 1, 2023 19(the effective date of Public Act 102-702) this amendatory Act 20of the 102nd General Assembly and that is contrary to this 21Section is void and unenforceable.22    (i) For substitute employees, all of the following apply:23        (1) The employment history review required by this 24    Section is required only prior to the initial hiring of a 25    substitute employee or placement on a school's approved 26    substitute list and shall remain valid as long as the   HB2995- 20 -LRB104 11192 LNS 21274 b1    substitute employee continues to be employed by the same 2    school or remains on the school's approved substitute 3    list.4        (2) A substitute employee seeking to be added to 5    another school's substitute list shall undergo an 6    additional employment history review under this Section. 7    Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (3) of this 8    subsection (i) or in subsection (k), the appearance of a 9    substitute employee on one school's substitute list does 10    not relieve another school from compliance with this 11    Section.12        (3) An employment history review conducted upon 13    initial hiring of a substitute employee by a contractor or 14    any other entity that furnishes substitute staffing 15    services to schools shall satisfy the requirements of this 16    Section for all schools using the services of that 17    contractor or other entity.18        (4) A contractor or any other entity furnishing 19    substitute staffing services to schools shall comply with 20    paragraphs (3) and (4) of subsection (j).21    (j) For employees of contractors, all of the following 22apply:23        (1) The employment history review required by this 24    Section shall be performed, either at the time of the 25    initial hiring of an employee or prior to the assignment 26    of an existing employee to perform work for a school in a   HB2995- 21 -LRB104 11192 LNS 21274 b1    position involving direct contact with children or 2    students. The review shall remain valid as long as the 3    employee remains employed by the same contractor, even if 4    assigned to perform work for other schools.5        (2) A contractor shall maintain records documenting 6    employment history reviews for all employees as required 7    by this Section and, upon request, shall provide a school 8    for whom an employee is assigned to perform work access to 9    the records pertaining to that employee.10        (3) Prior to assigning an employee to perform work for 11    a school in a position involving direct contact with 12    children or students, the contractor shall inform the 13    school of any instance known to the contractor in which 14    the employee:15            (A) has been the subject of a sexual misconduct 16        allegation unless a subsequent investigation resulted 17        in a finding that the allegation was false, unfounded, 18        indeterminable, or unsubstantiated or a finding was 19        otherwise overturned or expunged on appeal;20            (B) has ever been discharged, been asked to resign 21        from, resigned from, or otherwise been separated from 22        any employment, been removed from a substitute list, 23        been disciplined by an employer, or had an employment 24        contract not renewed due to an adjudication or finding 25        of sexual misconduct or while an allegation of sexual 26        misconduct was pending or under investigation, unless   HB2995- 22 -LRB104 11192 LNS 21274 b1        the investigation resulted in a finding that the 2        allegation was false, unfounded, indeterminable, or 3        unsubstantiated or a finding was otherwise overturned 4        or expunged on appeal; or5            (C) has ever had a license or certificate 6        suspended, surrendered, or revoked due to an 7        adjudication or finding of sexual misconduct or while 8        an allegation of sexual misconduct was pending or 9        under investigation, unless the investigation resulted 10        in a finding that the allegation was false, unfounded, 11        indeterminable, or unsubstantiated or a finding was 12        otherwise overturned or expunged on appeal.13        (4) The contractor may not assign an employee to 14    perform work for a school in a position involving direct 15    contact with children or students if the school objects to 16    the assignment after being informed of an instance listed 17    in paragraph (3).18    (k) An applicant who has undergone an employment history 19review under this Section and seeks to transfer to or provide 20services to another school in the same school district, 21diocese, or religious jurisdiction, or to another school 22established and supervised by the same organization is not 23required to obtain additional reports under this Section 24before transferring.25    (l) Nothing in this Section shall be construed:26        (1) to prevent a prospective employer from conducting   HB2995- 23 -LRB104 11192 LNS 21274 b1    further investigations of prospective employees or from 2    requiring applicants to provide additional background 3    information or authorizations beyond what is required 4    under this Section, nor to prevent a current or former 5    employer from disclosing more information than what is 6    required under this Section;7        (2) to relieve a school, school employee, contractor 8    of the school, or agent of the school from any legal 9    responsibility to report sexual misconduct in accordance 10    with State and federal reporting requirements;11        (3) to relieve a school, school employee, contractor 12    of the school, or agent of the school from any legal 13    responsibility to implement the provisions of Section 7926 14    of Chapter 20 of the United States Code; or15        (4) to prohibit the right of the exclusive bargaining 16    representative under a collective bargaining agreement to 17    grieve and arbitrate the validity of an employee's 18    termination or discipline for just cause.19    (m) The State Board of Education shall develop the 20templates required under paragraphs (3) and (4) of subsection 21(c).22(Source: P.A. 102-702, eff. 7-1-23; revised 7-17-24.)